Utah statutes.
58-71-304.   License renewal requirements.

(1)  As a condition precedent for license renewal, each licensee shall, during each two-year licensure cycle or other cycle defined by division rule, complete qualified continuing professional education requirements in accordance with the number of hours and standards defined by division rule made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-71-303, the continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section are increased or decreased proportionally.

